Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1136
Referees; oath or affirmation.

The referees must be sworn or affirmed well and faithfully to hear and examine the cause, and to make a just and true report therein according to the best of their understanding. The oath may be administered by any person authorized to take depositions.

R.S.1867, Code § 305, p. 445;

R.S.1913, § 7874;

C.S.1922, § 8819;

C.S.1929, § 20-1136;

R.S.1943, § 25-1136.

Failure to take oath is an irregularity waived by proceeding to trial without objection. Lamaster v. Scofield and Cowperthwait, 5 Neb. 148 (1876).